South Dakota, session 2026, HB1060.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 7-21-19 be AMENDED:
7-21-19. Before October first in each fiscal year and after the annual budget for
the following fiscal year has been approved and adopted, the board of county
commissioners shall, for each particular fund out of which appropriations are payable, levy
a tax that is sufficient to raise the difference between all appropriations contained in the
budget for the next fiscal year, payable out of each particular fund, and all revenue likely
to be received by each particular fund during the next fiscal year from all sources, including
the unobligated fund balance of each particular fund, but not including real property taxes
or any amount authorized by law to be held in reserve.
Nothing in this section authorizes any tax levy that exceeds any limitation upon
tax levies now or hereafter imposed by any law of this state.
Section 2. That § 10-12-8 be AMENDED:
10-12-8. Within ten days after the first Tuesday in September of each year, the
board of county commissioners shall levy the necessary taxes for the current fiscal year
on all taxable property in the county. The taxes are based on an itemized estimate of the
county expenses for the ensuing year and may not exceed the limitation set forth in § 10-
13-35.
Section 3. That § 7-21-18 be REPEALED.

26.181.10 2 1060
An Act to remove the five percent calculation requirement from the county budgetary process.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
House as Bill No. 1060
By
Chief Clerk of the House for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
Speaker of the House ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Chief Clerk of the House
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
President of the Senate
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Secretary of the Senate Secretary of State
House Bill No. 1060 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
HB1060 ENROLLED